Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB625.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 141.019 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of taxpayers other than corporations:
(1) Adjusted gross income shall be calculated by subtracting from the gross income of
those taxpayers the deductions allowed individuals by Section 62 of the Internal
Revenue Code and adjusting as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude income from supplemental annuities provided by the Railroad
Retirement Act of 1937 as amended and which are subject to federal income
tax by Pub. L. No. 89-699;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude employee pension contributions picked up as provided for in KRS
6.505, 16.545, 21.360, 61.523, 61.560, 65.155, 67A.320, 67A.510, 78.610,
and 161.540 upon a ruling by the Internal Revenue Service or the federal
courts that these contributions shall not be included as gross income until such
time as the contributions are distributed or made available to the employee;
(e) Exclude Social Security and railroad retirement benefits subject to federal
income tax;
(f) Exclude any money received because of a settlement or judgment in a lawsuit
brought against a manufacturer or distributor of "Agent Orange" for damages
resulting from exposure to Agent Orange by a member or veteran of the
Armed Forces of the United States or any dependent of such person who
served in Vietnam;
(g) 1. a. For taxable years beginning after December 31, 2005, but before
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
January 1, 2018, exclude up to forty-one thousand one hundred ten
dollars ($41,110) of total distributions from pension plans, annuity
contracts, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans; and
b. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018, exclude
up to thirty-one thousand one hundred ten dollars ($31,110) of
total distributions from pension plans, annuity contracts, profit-
sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee savings plans.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Annuity contract" has the same meaning as set forth in Section
1035 of the Internal Revenue Code;
b. "Distributions" includes but is not limited to any lump-sum
distribution from pension or profit-sharing plans qualifying for the
income tax averaging provisions of Section 402 of the Internal
Revenue Code; any distribution from an individual retirement
account as defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
and any disability pension distribution; and
c. "Pension plans, profit-sharing plans, retirement plans, or employee
savings plans" means any trust or other entity created or organized
under a written retirement plan and forming part of a stock bonus,
pension, or profit-sharing plan of a public or private employer for
the exclusive benefit of employees or their beneficiaries and
includes plans qualified or unqualified under Section 401 of the
Internal Revenue Code and individual retirement accounts as
defined in Section 408 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(h) 1. a. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation subject to the franchise tax imposed
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS
136.300; and
b. Exclude the portion of the distributive share of a shareholder's net
income from an S corporation related to a qualified subchapter S
subsidiary subject to the franchise tax imposed under KRS
136.505 or the capital stock tax imposed under KRS 136.300.
2. The shareholder's basis of stock held in an S corporation where the S
corporation or its qualified subchapter S subsidiary is subject to the
franchise tax imposed under KRS 136.505 or the capital stock tax
imposed under KRS 136.300 shall be the same as the basis for federal
income tax purposes;
(i) Exclude income received for services performed as a precinct worker for
election training or for working at election booths in state, county, and local
primaries or regular or special elections;
(j) Exclude any capital gains income attributable to property taken by eminent
domain;
(k) 1. Exclude all income from all sources for members of the Armed Forces
who are on active duty and who are killed in the line of duty, for the
year during which the death occurred and the year prior to the year
during which the death occurred.
2. For the purposes of this paragraph, "all income from all sources" shall
include all federal and state death benefits payable to the estate or any
beneficiaries;
(l) Exclude all military pay received by members of the Armed Forces while on
active duty;
(m) 1. Include the amount deducted for depreciation under 26 U.S.C. sec. 167
or 168; and
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
2. Exclude the amounts allowed by KRS 141.0101 for depreciation;
(n) Include the amount deducted under 26 U.S.C. sec. 199A;
(o) Ignore any change in the cost basis of the surviving spouse's share of property
owned by a Kentucky community property trust occurring for federal income
tax purposes as a result of the death of the predeceasing spouse;
(p) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;[
and]
(q) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before March 11,
2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
(r) 1. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, ignore
capital gains and capital losses attributable to the sale or exchange of
currency or bullion.
2. As used in this paragraph "currency" or "bullion" have the same
meaning as in KRS 139.480; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from adjusted gross income all the
deductions allowed individuals by Chapter 1 of the Internal Revenue Code, as
modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
(a) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 164 for taxes;
(b) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 165 for losses, except wagering
losses allowed under Section 165(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 213 for medical care expenses;
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
(d) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 217 for moving expenses;
(e) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 67 for any other miscellaneous
deduction;
(f) Any deduction allowed by the Internal Revenue Code for amounts allowable
under KRS 140.090(1)(h) in calculating the value of the distributive shares of
the estate of a decedent, unless there is filed with the income return a
statement that the deduction has not been claimed under KRS 140.090(1)(h);
(g) Any deduction allowed by 26 U.S.C. sec. 151 for personal exemptions and
any other deductions in lieu thereof;
(h) Any deduction allowed for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the civil
rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal membership
and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services, facilities, privileges,
advantages, or accommodations to any person because of race, color, religion,
national origin, or sex, except nothing shall be construed to deny a deduction
for amounts paid to any religious or denominational club, group, or
establishment or any organization operated solely for charitable or educational
purposes which restricts membership to persons of the same religion or
denomination in order to promote the religious principles for which it is
established and maintained; and
(i) A taxpayer may elect to claim the standard deduction allowed by KRS
141.081 instead of itemized deductions allowed pursuant to 26 U.S.C. sec. 63
and as modified by this section.
Section 2. KRS 141.039 is amended to read as follows:
In the case of corporations:
(1) Gross income shall be calculated by adjusting federal gross income as defined in
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
Section 61 of the Internal Revenue Code as follows:
(a) Exclude income that is exempt from state taxation by the Kentucky
Constitution and the Constitution and statutory laws of the United States;
(b) Exclude all dividend income;
(c) Include interest income derived from obligations of sister states and political
subdivisions thereof;
(d) Exclude fifty percent (50%) of gross income derived from any disposal of
coal covered by Section 631(c) of the Internal Revenue Code if the
corporation does not claim any deduction for percentage depletion, or for
expenditures attributable to the making and administering of the contract
under which such disposition occurs or to the preservation of the economic
interests retained under such contract;
(e) Include the amount calculated under KRS 141.205;
(f) Ignore the provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code in
computing gross income;
(g) Include the amount of deprecation deduction calculated under 26 U.S.C. sec.
167 or 168;
(h) Allow the same treatment allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs. 276 and
278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans, deductions
attributable to those loans, and tax attributes associated with those loans for
taxable years ending on or after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022;
[and]
(i) 1. For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2026, ignore
capital gains and capital losses attributable to the sale or exchange of
currency or bullion.
2. As used in this paragraph "currency" or "bullion" have the same
meaning as in KRS 139.480; and
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
(j)[(i)] For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2020, but before
March 11, 2023, allow the same treatment of restaurant revitalization grants in
accordance with Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
related to the tax treatment of the grants, deductions attributable to those
grants, and tax attributes associated with those grants; and
(2) Net income shall be calculated by subtracting from gross income:
(a) The deduction for depreciation allowed by KRS 141.0101;
(b) Any amount paid for vouchers or similar instruments that provide health
insurance coverage to employees or their families;
(c) All the deductions from gross income allowed corporations by Chapter 1 of
the Internal Revenue Code, as modified by KRS 141.0101, except:
1. Any deduction for a state tax which is computed, in whole or in part, by
reference to gross or net income and which is paid or accrued to any
state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth
of Puerto Rico, any territory or possession of the United States, or to any
foreign country or political subdivision thereof;
2. The deductions contained in Sections 243, 245, and 247 of the Internal
Revenue Code;
3. The provisions of Section 281 of the Internal Revenue Code shall be
ignored in computing net income;
4. Any deduction directly or indirectly allocable to income which is either
exempt from taxation or otherwise not taxed under the provisions of this
chapter, except for deductions allowed under Pub. L. No. 116-260, secs.
276 and 278, related to the tax treatment of forgiven covered loans and
deductions attributable to those loans for taxable years ending on or
after March 27, 2020, but before January 1, 2022; and deductions
allowed under Pub. L. No. 117-2, sec. 9673 and 15 U.S.C. sec. 9009c,
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
related to the tax treatment of restaurant revitalization grants and
deductions attributable to those grants for taxable years beginning on or
after January 1, 2020, but before March 11, 2023. Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to permit the same item to be deducted more
than once;
5. Any deduction for amounts paid to any club, organization, or
establishment which has been determined by the courts or an agency
established by the General Assembly and charged with enforcing the
civil rights laws of the Commonwealth, not to afford full and equal
membership and full and equal enjoyment of its goods, services,
facilities, privileges, advantages, or accommodations to any person
because of race, color, religion, national origin, or sex, except nothing
shall be construed to deny a deduction for amounts paid to any religious
or denominational club, group, or establishment or any organization
operated solely for charitable or educational purposes which restricts
membership to persons of the same religion or denomination in order to
promote the religious principles for which it is established and
maintained;
6. Any deduction prohibited by KRS 141.205; and
7. Any dividends-paid deduction of any captive real estate investment
trust; and
(d) 1. A deferred tax deduction in an amount computed in accordance with this
paragraph.
2. For purposes of this paragraph:
a. "Net deferred tax asset" means that deferred tax assets exceed the
deferred tax liabilities of the combined group, as computed in
accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
United States of America; and
b. "Net deferred tax liability" means deferred tax liabilities that
exceed the deferred tax assets of a combined group as defined in
KRS 141.202, as computed in accordance with accounting
principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
3. Only publicly traded companies, including affiliated corporations
participating in the filing of a publicly traded company's financial
statements prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States of America, as of January 1, 2019, shall be
eligible for this deduction.
4. If the provisions of KRS 141.202 result in an aggregate increase to the
member's net deferred tax liability, an aggregate decrease to the
member's net deferred tax asset, or an aggregate change from a net
deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax liability, the combined group
shall be entitled to a deduction, as determined in this paragraph.
5. For ten (10) years beginning with the combined group's first taxable
year beginning on or after January 1, 2026, a combined group shall be
entitled to a deduction from the combined group's entire net income
equal to one-tenth (1/10) of the amount necessary to offset the increase
in the net deferred tax liability, decrease in the net deferred tax asset, or
aggregate change from a net deferred tax asset to a net deferred tax
liability. The increase in the net deferred tax liability, decrease in the net
deferred tax asset, or the aggregate change from a net deferred tax asset
to a net deferred tax liability shall be computed based on the change that
would result from the imposition of the combined reporting requirement
under KRS 141.202, but for the deduction provided under this paragraph
as of June 27, 2019.
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
6. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this paragraph
shall be converted to the annual deferred tax deduction amount, as
follows:
a. The deferred tax impact determined in subparagraph 5. of this
paragraph shall be divided by the tax rate determined under KRS
141.040;
b. The resulting amount shall be further divided by the
apportionment factor determined by KRS 141.120 or 141.121 that
was used by the combined group in the calculation of the deferred
tax assets and deferred tax liabilities as described in subparagraph
5. of this paragraph; and
c. The resulting amount represents the total net deferred tax
deduction available over the ten (10) year period as described in
subparagraph 5. of this paragraph.
7. The deduction calculated under this paragraph shall not be adjusted as a
result of any events happening subsequent to the calculation, including
but not limited to any disposition or abandonment of assets. The
deduction shall be calculated without regard to the federal tax effect and
shall not alter the tax basis of any asset. If the deduction under this
section is greater than the combined group's entire Kentucky net income,
any excess deduction shall be carried forward and applied as a deduction
to the combined group's entire net income in future taxable years until
fully utilized.
8. Any combined group intending to claim a deduction under this
paragraph shall file a statement with the department on or before July 1,
2019. The statement shall specify the total amount of the deduction
which the combined group claims on the form, including calculations
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1574
and other information supporting the total amounts of the deduction as
required by the department. No deduction shall be allowed under this
paragraph for any taxable year, except to the extent claimed on the
timely filed statement in accordance with this paragraph.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 2/14/2025 12:39 PM Jacketed